Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1349.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Digital Provenance Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence" or "AI." A machine-based system capable of making, for a given set of human-defined objectives, predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments that use machine-based and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual environments, abstract the 12345678910111213141516171819 perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner and use model inference to formulate options for information or action. The term includes the class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content which includes information such as images, videos, audio clips and text that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms."Bureau." The Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General."Capture device." A device capable of recording at least 10 photographic, audio or video content instances, including, but not limited to, video and still photography cameras, mobile phones with built-in cameras or microphones and voice recorders."Covered AI tool provider." A person that creates, codes or otherwise produces a generative artificial intelligence system that:(1) has more than 1,000,000 monthly visitors worldwide or users on average over the preceding 12-month period and is publicly accessible within the geographic boundaries of this Commonwealth; and(2) uses a generative artificial intelligence system to generate, manipulate or otherwise edit audio, video and image content."Generative artificial intelligence system." An artificial intelligence system capable of generating synthetic images, videos, audio content or any combination thereof that emulates the structure and characteristics of the system's training data. This definition does not include a system that generates only text-based content."Large online platform." A public-facing social media 20260SB1349PN1767 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 platform, content-sharing platform, messaging platform, advertising network, stand-alone search engine or web browser that distributes content to users who did not create or collaborate in creating the content that exceeded 2,000,000 unique monthly users during the preceding 12 months."Person." The term includes a governmental entity."Provenance label." A disclosure embedded in image, video or audio content in a manner that is machine-readable."Provenance label reading tool." A software program, application or other mechanism that reads a provenance label and allows a person to determine whether an image, video or audio content was created or altered by a specific covered AI tool provider's generative artificial intelligence system."Synthetic content." Audio or visual content that has been generated or materially altered by synthetic content creations.Section 3. Requirements for covered AI tool providers.(a) Provenance label reading tool.--A covered AI tool provider shall make available, at no cost to a person, a provenance label reading tool that:(1) is publicly accessible through a conspicuous link on the covered AI tool provider's publicly accessible Internet website and any corresponding mobile application;(2) allows a person to do either of the following:(i) upload an image, video or audio content; or(ii) provide an apparent Uniform Resource Locator that links an image, video or audio content;(3) supports access via an Application Program Interface that allows a person to programmatically submit content for assessment without accessing the covered AI tool provider's publicly accessible Internet website;20260SB1349PN1767 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) provides a mechanism for a person to submit feedback regarding the tool's efficacy which the covered AI tool provider considers and uses to improve the tool; and(5) does not disclose personal information that may be contained in the provenance label, unless the disclosure is required by court order or law enforcement activity.(b) Prohibitions on covered AI tool providers.--A covered AI tool provider may not:(1) Collect or retain any personal information from a person who utilizes the provenance label reading tool, except that the covered AI tool provider may retain contact information voluntarily provided by a person who submits feedback under subsection (a)(4).(2) Retain any content submitted to the provenance label reading tool for longer than necessary to comply with this act.(c) Content disclosures.--A covered AI tool provider shall include a provenance label in any image, video or audio content instance created by its generative artificial intelligence system and the provenance label shall:(1) Be readable by the provenance label reading tool required by subsection (a).(2) Be permanent or extraordinarily difficult to remove.(3) Convey, either directly or indirectly through a link to a permanent publicly accessible Internet website:(i) The name of the covered AI tool provider.(ii) The name and version number of the generative artificial intelligence system that created or altered the content.(iii) The time and date that the content was created 20260SB1349PN1767 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or altered.(4) Convey, either directly or through a link to a permanent publicly accessible Internet website, information to determine if digital content has been subjected to or created by one or more of the following:(i) Significant augmentation or correction by a human or correction algorithm such as the removal or insertion of people or objects.(ii) Minor augmentation or correction by human or algorithm such as a digital photo that has been modified to change attributes such as brightness, contrast or noise.(iii) Algorithmic instantiation, using as its basis, an underlying model derived from sample content or training data such as an image created from a prompt to a generative AI chatbot.Section 4. Requirements for large online providers.(a) Duties.--A large online provider shall:(1) Provide a mechanism to disclose any machine-readable provenance label detected in content distributed on the large online platform that meets the following criteria:(i) The mechanism indicates whether a provenance label is available.(ii) The mechanism is presented in a conspicuous manner to users.(2) Allow a user to inspect any provenance label in an easily accessible manner.(b) Restrictions on large online providers.--A large online provider may not:(1) Strip a provenance label from content uploaded or 20260SB1349PN1767 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributed on the large online platform.(2) Retain any personal provenance data from content shared on the large online platform.Section 5. Requirements for capture devices.A manufacturer of capture devices shall, with respect to any capture device the capture device manufacturer produces for the sale in this Commonwealth:(1) Provide a user with the option to include a provenance label in content captured by the capture device that conveys:(i) The name of the capture device manufacturer.(ii) The name and version number of the capture device that created or altered the content.(iii) The time and date of the content's creation or alteration.The options required by this paragraph shall be available for the capture device's default capture application and third-party applications that bypass default capture applications in order to offer capture functionalities.(2) Embed provenance labels in content captured by the device by default.(3) Clearly inform users of the existence of settings related to provenance labels upon a user's first use of the recording function line on the capture device.(4) If a capture device application is in use, contain a clear indicator when a provenance label is applied.(5) Include in the capture device's default capture application the ability for a user to opt out of the inclusion of a provenance label based on guidelines or specifications promulgated by an established standard-setting 20260SB1349PN1767 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 body in the user's captured content.Section 6. Third-party licenses.(a) Duties of licensees.--If a covered AI tool provider licenses its generative system to a third party, the covered AI tool provider shall require by contract that the licensee maintain the system's capability to include a provenance label consistent with section 3(c).(b) Revocation of license.--(1) If a covered AI tool provider has actual knowledge that a third-party licensee has modified a generative artificial intelligence system to remove its capability to include a latent disclosure, the covered AI tool provider shall revoke the third party's license to use the system within 96 hours of obtaining the knowledge.(2) A third-party licensee whose license to use a generative artificial intelligence system is revoked under paragraph (1) may not use the system after the revocation.Section 7. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Administration and enforcement generally.--The bureau shall administer and enforce this act.(b) Actions by bureau.--In enforcing this act, the bureau may:(1) Impose a fine on a covered AI tool provider that violates this act and that is found liable for a civil penalty in the amount not to exceed $5,000 per violation.(2) Subject a third-party licensee that violates section 6(b) to a civil action for injunctive relief for violation of this act.(3) Bring a civil action to enforce this act and collect civil penalties under this subsection or seek injunctive 20260SB1349PN1767 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relief.(c) Judicial relief.--If a court awards judgment or injunctive relief to the bureau, the court shall award the bureau:(1) Reasonable attorney fees.(2) Court costs.(3) Investigative fees.(d) Attorney General.--The Attorney General may bring a civil action on behalf of the bureau to collect a fine or civil penalty imposed under this section.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260SB1349PN1767 - 8 - 123456789101112